Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 57-1401
to 57-1413 shall be known and may be cited as the Major Oil Pipeline
Siting Act.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1161, § 2.